Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6901
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of sections 44-6901 to 44-6918, the definitions found in sections 44-6902 to 44-6915.01 shall be used.

Laws 1997, LB 862, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 1253, § 38;

Laws 2002, LB 1139, § 44.